California statutes. Family Code
(a) If all of the parties who are individuals reside in this state and the child does not reside in the issuing state, a tribunal of this state has jurisdiction to enforce and to modify the issuing state’s child-support order in a proceeding to register that order.

(b) A tribunal of this state exercising jurisdiction under this section shall apply the provisions of Chapters 1 and 2, and this chapter, and the procedural and substantive law of this state to the proceeding for enforcement or modification. Chapters 3, 4, 5, 7, and 8 do not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.614.

Within 30 days after issuance of a modified child-support order, the party obtaining the modification shall file a certified copy of the order with the issuing tribunal that had continuing, exclusive jurisdiction over the earlier order, and in each tribunal in which the party knows the earlier order has been registered. A party who obtains the order and fails to file a certified copy is subject to appropriate sanctions by a tribunal in which the issue of failure to file arises. The failure to file does not affect the validity or enforceability of the modified order of the new tribunal having continuing, exclusive jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Registration and Modification of Foreign Child-Support Order [5700.615. - 5700.616.]

5700.615.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in Section 5700.711, if a foreign country lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its child-support order pursuant to its laws, a tribunal of this state may assume jurisdiction to modify the child-support order and bind all individuals subject to the personal jurisdiction of the tribunal whether the consent to modification of a child-support order otherwise required of the individual pursuant to Section 5700.611 has been given or whether the individual seeking modification is a resident of this state or of the foreign country.

(b) An order issued by a tribunal of this state modifying a foreign child-support
 order pursuant to this section is the controlling order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.616.

A party or support enforcement agency seeking to modify, or to modify and enforce, a foreign child-support order not under the Convention may register that order in this state under Sections 5700.601 through 5700.608 if the order has not been registered. A petition for modification may be filed at the same time as a request for registration, or at another time. The petition must specify the grounds for modification.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Support Proceeding Under Convention [5700.701. - 5700.713.]

5700.701.

In this chapter:

(1) “Application” means a request under the Convention by an obligee or obligor, or on behalf of a child, made through a central authority for assistance from another central authority.

(2) “Central authority” means the entity designated by the United States or a foreign country described in Section 5700.102(5)(D) to perform the functions specified in the Convention.

(3) “Convention support order” means a support order of a tribunal of a foreign country described in Section 5700.102(5)(D).

(4) “Direct request” means a petition filed by an individual in
 a tribunal of this state in a proceeding involving an obligee, obligor, or child residing outside the United States.

(5) “Foreign central authority” means the entity designated by a foreign country described in Section 5700.102(5)(D) to perform the functions specified in the Convention.

(6) “Foreign support agreement”:

(A) means an agreement for support in a record that:

(i) is enforceable as a support order in the country of origin;

(ii) has been:

(I) formally drawn up or registered as an authentic instrument by a foreign
 tribunal; or

(II) authenticated by, or concluded, registered, or filed with a foreign tribunal; and

(iii) may be reviewed and modified by a foreign tribunal; and

(B) includes a maintenance arrangement or authentic instrument under the Convention.

(7) “United States central authority” means the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.702.

This chapter applies only to a support proceeding under the Convention. In such a proceeding, if a provision of this chapter is inconsistent with Chapters 1 through 6, this chapter controls.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.703.

The Department of Child Support Services is recognized as the agency designated by the United States central authority to perform specific functions under the Convention.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.704.

(a) In a support proceeding under this chapter, the Department of Child Support Services shall:

(1) transmit and receive applications; and

(2) initiate or facilitate the institution of a proceeding regarding an application in a tribunal of this state.

(b) The following support proceedings are available to an obligee under the Convention:

(1) recognition or recognition and enforcement of a foreign support order;

(2) enforcement of a support order issued or recognized in this state;

(3) establishment of a support order if there is no existing order, including, if necessary, determination of parentage of a child;

(4) establishment of a support order if recognition of a foreign support order is refused under Section 5700.708(b)(2), (4), or (9);

(5) modification of a support order of a tribunal of this state; and

(6) modification of a support order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign country.

(c) The following support proceedings are available under the Convention to an obligor against which
 there is an existing support order:

(1) recognition of an order suspending or limiting enforcement of an existing support order of a tribunal of this state;

(2) modification of a support order of a tribunal of this state; and

(3) modification of a support order of a tribunal of another state or a foreign country.

(d) A tribunal of this state may not require security, bond, or deposit, however described, to guarantee the payment of costs and expenses in proceedings under the Convention.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.705.

(a) A petitioner may file a direct request seeking establishment or modification of a support order or determination of parentage of a child. In the proceeding, the law of this state applies.

(b) A petitioner may file a direct request seeking recognition and enforcement of a support order or support agreement. In the proceeding, Sections 5700.706 through 5700.713 apply.

(c) In a direct request for recognition and enforcement of a Convention support order or foreign support agreement:

(1) a security, bond, or deposit is not required to guarantee
 the payment of costs and expenses; and

(2) an obligee or obligor that in the issuing country has benefited from free legal assistance is entitled to benefit, at least to the same extent, from any free legal assistance provided for by the law of this state under the same circumstances.

(d) A petitioner filing a direct request is not entitled to assistance from the Department of Child Support Services.

(e) This chapter does not prevent the application of laws of this state that provide simplified, more expeditious rules regarding a direct request for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support order or foreign support agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.706.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a party who is an individual or a support enforcement agency seeking recognition of a Convention support order shall register the order in this state as provided in Chapter 6.

(b) Notwithstanding Sections 5700.311 and 5700.602(a), a request for registration of a Convention support order must be accompanied by:

(1) a complete text of the support order or an abstract or extract of the support order drawn up by the issuing foreign tribunal, which may be in the form recommended by the Hague Conference on Private International Law;

(2) a record stating that the support order is enforceable in the issuing country;

(3) if the respondent did not appear and was not represented in the proceedings in the issuing country, a record attesting, as appropriate, either that the respondent had proper notice of the proceedings and an opportunity to be heard or that the respondent had proper notice of the support order and an opportunity to be heard in a challenge or appeal on fact or law before a tribunal;

(4) a record showing the amount of arrears, if any, and the date the amount was calculated;

(5) a record showing a requirement for automatic adjustment of the amount of support, if any, and the
 information necessary to make the appropriate calculations; and

(6) if necessary, a record showing the extent to which the applicant received free legal assistance in the issuing country.

(c) A request for registration of a Convention support order may seek recognition and partial enforcement of the order.

(d) A tribunal of this state may vacate the registration of a Convention support order without the filing of a contest under Section 5700.707 only if, acting on its own motion, the tribunal finds that recognition and enforcement of the order would be manifestly incompatible with public policy.

(e) The tribunal shall promptly notify the parties of the registration
 or the order vacating the registration of a Convention support order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.707.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, Sections 5700.605 through 5700.608 apply to a contest of a registered Convention support order.

(b) A party contesting a registered Convention support order shall file a contest not later than 30 days after notice of the registration, but if the contesting party does not reside in the United States, the contest must be filed not later than 60 days after notice of the registration.

(c) If the nonregistering party fails to contest the registered Convention support order by the time specified in subsection (b), the order is enforceable.

(d) A contest of a registered Convention support order may be based only on grounds set forth in Section 5700.708. The contesting party bears the burden of proof.

(e) In a contest of a registered Convention support order, a tribunal of this state:

(1) is bound by the findings of fact on which the foreign tribunal based its jurisdiction; and

(2) may not review the merits of the order.

(f) A tribunal of this state deciding a contest of a registered Convention support order shall promptly notify the parties of its decision.

(g) A
 challenge or appeal, if any, does not stay the enforcement of a Convention support order unless there are exceptional circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.708.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce a registered Convention support order.

(b) The following grounds are the only grounds on which a tribunal of this state may refuse recognition and enforcement of a registered Convention support order:

(1) recognition and enforcement of the order is manifestly incompatible with public policy, including the failure of the issuing tribunal to observe minimum standards of due process, which include notice and an opportunity to be heard;

(2) the issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction consistent with Section 5700.201;

(3) the order is not enforceable in the issuing country;

(4) the order was obtained by fraud in connection with a matter of procedure;

(5) a record transmitted in accordance with Section 5700.706 lacks authenticity or integrity;

(6) a proceeding between the same parties and having the same purpose is pending before a tribunal of this state and that proceeding was the first to be filed;

(7) the order is incompatible with a more recent support order involving the same parties and having the same purpose if
 the more recent support order is entitled to recognition and enforcement under this part in this state;

(8) payment, to the extent alleged arrears have been paid in whole or in part;

(9) in a case in which the respondent neither appeared nor was represented in the proceeding in the issuing foreign country:

(A) if the law of that country provides for prior notice of proceedings, the respondent did not have proper notice of the proceedings and an opportunity to be heard; or

(B) if the law of that country does not provide for prior notice of the proceedings, the respondent did not have proper notice of the order and an opportunity to be heard in a challenge or
 appeal on fact or law before a tribunal; or

(10) the order was made in violation of Section 5700.711.

(c) If a tribunal of this state does not recognize a Convention support order under subsection (b)(2), (4), or (9):

(1) the tribunal may not dismiss the proceeding without allowing a reasonable time for a party to request the establishment of a new Convention support order; and

(2) the Department of Child Support Services shall take all appropriate measures to request a child-support order for the obligee if the application for recognition and enforcement was received under Section 5700.704.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.709.

If a tribunal of this state does not recognize and enforce a Convention support order in its entirety, it shall enforce any severable part of the order. An application or direct request may seek recognition and partial enforcement of a Convention support order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.710.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (d), a tribunal of this state shall recognize and enforce a foreign support agreement registered in this state.

(b) An application or direct request for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support agreement must be accompanied by:

(1) a complete text of the foreign support agreement; and

(2) a record stating that the foreign support agreement is enforceable as an order of support in the issuing country.

(c) A tribunal of
 this state may vacate the registration of a foreign support agreement only if, acting on its own motion, the tribunal finds that recognition and enforcement would be manifestly incompatible with public policy.

(d) In a contest of a foreign support agreement, a tribunal of this state may refuse recognition and enforcement of the agreement if it finds:

(1) recognition and enforcement of the agreement is manifestly incompatible with public policy;

(2) the agreement was obtained by fraud or falsification;

(3) the agreement is incompatible with a support order involving the same parties and having the same purpose in this state, another state, or a foreign country
 if the support order is entitled to recognition and enforcement under this act in this state; or

(4) the record submitted under subsection (b) lacks authenticity or integrity.

(e) A proceeding for recognition and enforcement of a foreign support agreement must be suspended during the pendency of a challenge to or appeal of the agreement before a tribunal of another state or a foreign country.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.711.

(a) A tribunal of this state may not modify a Convention child-support order if the obligee remains a resident of the foreign country where the support order was issued unless:

(1) the obligee submits to the jurisdiction of a tribunal of this state, either expressly or by defending on the merits of the case without objecting to the jurisdiction at the first available opportunity; or

(2) the foreign tribunal lacks or refuses to exercise jurisdiction to modify its support order or issue a new support order.

(b) If a tribunal of this state does not modify a
 Convention child-support order because the order is not recognized in this state, Section 5700.708(c) applies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.712.

Personal information gathered or transmitted under this chapter may be used only for the purposes for which it was gathered or transmitted.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.713.

A record filed with a tribunal of this state under this chapter must be in the original language and, if not in English, must be accompanied by an English translation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Interstate Rendition [5700.801. - 5700.802.]

5700.801.

(a) For purposes of this chapter, “governor” includes an individual performing the functions of governor or the executive authority of a state covered by this part.

(b) The Governor may:

(1) demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual found in the other state who is charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee; or

(2) on the demand of the governor of another state, surrender an individual found in this state who is charged criminally in the other state with having failed
 to provide for the support of an obligee.

(c) A provision for extradition of individuals not inconsistent with this act applies to the demand even if the individual whose surrender is demanded was not in the demanding state when the crime was allegedly committed and has not fled therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.802.

(a) Before making a demand that the governor of another state surrender an individual charged criminally in this state with having failed to provide for the support of an obligee, the Governor may require a prosecutor of this state to demonstrate that at least 60 days previously the obligee had initiated proceedings for support pursuant to this act or that the proceeding would be of no avail.

(b) If, under this act or a law substantially similar to this act, the Governor of another state makes a demand that the Governor of this state surrender an individual charged criminally in that state with having failed to provide for the support of a child or other individual
 to whom a duty of support is owed, the Governor may require a prosecutor to investigate the demand and report whether a proceeding for support has been initiated or would be effective. If it appears that a proceeding would be effective but has not been initiated, the Governor may delay honoring the demand for a reasonable time to permit the initiation of a proceeding.

(c) If a proceeding for support has been initiated and the individual whose rendition is demanded prevails, the Governor may decline to honor the demand. If the petitioner prevails and the individual whose rendition is demanded is subject to a support order, the Governor may decline to honor the demand if the individual is complying with the support order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Miscellaneous Provisions [5700.901. - 5700.905.]

5700.901.

In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.902.

This part applies to proceedings begun on or after January 1, 2016, to establish a support order or determine parentage of a child or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior support order, determination, or agreement, whenever issued or entered.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.903.

If any provision of this part or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this part which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this part are severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

5700.905.

The Department of Child Support Services may adopt emergency regulations as appropriate to implement this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 493, Sec. 5.   (SB 646)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 10. PREVENTION OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE [6200. - 6460.]



PART 1. SHORT TITLE AND DEFINITIONS [6200. - 6219.]

6200.

This division may be cited as the Domestic Violence Prevention Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6201.

Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, the definitions in this part govern the construction of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6203.

(a) For purposes of this act, “abuse” means any of the following:

(1) To intentionally or recklessly cause or attempt to cause bodily injury.

(2) Sexual assault.

(3) To place a person in reasonable apprehension of imminent serious bodily injury to that person or to another.

(4) To engage in any behavior that has been or could be enjoined pursuant to Section 6320.

(b) Abuse is not limited to the actual infliction of physical injury or
 assault.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 149.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

6205.

“Affinity,” when applied to the marriage relation, signifies the connection existing in consequence of marriage between each of the married persons and the blood relatives of the other.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6209.

“Cohabitant” means a person who regularly resides in the household. “Former cohabitant” means a person who formerly regularly resided in the household.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6210.

“Dating relationship” means frequent, intimate associations primarily characterized by the expectation of affection or sexual involvement independent of financial considerations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 110, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6211.

“Domestic violence” is abuse perpetrated against any of the following persons:

(a) A spouse or former spouse.

(b) A cohabitant or former cohabitant, as defined in Section 6209.

(c) A person with whom the respondent is having or has had a dating or engagement relationship.

(d) A person with whom the respondent has had a child, where the presumption applies that the male parent is the father of the child of the female parent under the Uniform Parentage Act (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 12).

(e) A child of a party or a child who is the subject of an action under the Uniform Parentage Act, where the presumption applies that the male parent is the father of the child to be protected.

(f) Any other person related by consanguinity or affinity within the second degree.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6215.

“Emergency protective order” means an order issued under Part 3 (commencing with Section 6240).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6216.

For the purposes of this division, “firearm” includes the frame or receiver of the weapon, including a completed frame or receiver or a firearm precursor part. “Firearm precursor part” has the same meaning as in subdivision (a) of Section 16531 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 2.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6218.

“Protective order” means an order that includes any of the following restraining orders, whether issued ex parte, after notice and hearing, or in a judgment:

(a) An order described in Section 6320 enjoining specific acts of abuse.

(b) An order described in Section 6321 excluding a person from a dwelling.

(c) An order described in Section 6322 enjoining other specified behavior.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6219.

Subject to adequate, discretionary funding from a city or a county, the superior courts in San Diego County and in Santa Clara County may develop a demonstration project to identify the best practices in civil, juvenile, and criminal court cases involving domestic violence. The superior courts in any other county that is able and willing may also participate in the demonstration project. The superior courts participating in this demonstration project shall report their findings and recommendations to the Judicial Council and the Legislature on or before May 1, 2004. The Judicial Council may make those recommendations available to any court or county.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 192, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. GENERAL PROVISIONS [6220. - 6229.]

6220.

The purpose of this division is to prevent acts of domestic violence, abuse, and sexual abuse and to provide for a separation of the persons involved in the domestic violence for a period sufficient to enable these persons to seek a resolution of the causes of the violence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 635, Sec. 3.   (AB 2089)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

6221.

(a) Unless the provision or context otherwise requires, this division applies to any order described in this division, whether the order is issued in a proceeding brought pursuant to this division, in an action brought pursuant to the Uniform Parentage Act (Part 3 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 12), or in a proceeding for dissolution of marriage, for nullity of marriage, or for legal separation of the parties.

(b) Nothing in this division affects the jurisdiction of the juvenile court.

(c) Any order issued by a court to which this division applies shall be issued on forms adopted by the Judicial Council of California and that have been approved by the Department of Justice pursuant to subdivision (i) of Section 6380. However, the fact that an order issued by a court pursuant to this section was not issued on forms adopted by the Judicial Council and approved by the Department of Justice shall not, in
 and of itself, make the order unenforceable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 661, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6222.

There is no filing fee for an application, a responsive pleading, or an order to show cause that seeks to obtain, modify, or enforce a protective order or other order authorized by this division when the request for the other order is necessary to obtain or give effect to a protective order. There is no fee for a subpoena filed in connection with that application, responsive pleading, or order to show cause. There is no fee for any filings related to a petition filed pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with 6300) of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 686, Sec. 1.   (SB 538)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6223.

A custody or visitation order issued in a proceeding brought pursuant to this division is subject to Part 2 (commencing with Section 3020) of Division 8 (custody of children).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6224.

An order described in this division shall state on its face the date of expiration of the order and the following statements in substantially the following form:

“This order is effective when made. The law enforcement agency shall enforce it immediately on receipt. It is enforceable anywhere in California by any law enforcement agency that has received the order or is shown a copy of the order. If proof of service on the restrained person has not been received, the law enforcement agency shall advise the restrained person of the terms of the order and then shall enforce it.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6225.

A petition for an order described in this division is valid and the order is enforceable without explicitly stating the address of the petitioner or the petitioner’s place of residence, school, employment, the place where the petitioner’s child is provided child care services, or the child’s school.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6226.

The Judicial Council shall prescribe the form of the orders and any other documents required by this division and shall promulgate forms and instructions for applying for orders described in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6226.5.

(a) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall amend the Judicial Council form entitled “Can a Domestic Violence Restraining Order Help Me?” to include a brief description of the address confidentiality program established under Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 6205) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the benefits of enrollment in the program for victims of domestic violence, and the internet address for the Secretary of State’s internet web page that contains more detailed information about the program.

(b) On or before January 1, 2023, the Judicial Council shall make the Judicial Council form available in English and in at least the
 other languages described in Section 1632 of the Civil Code. The Judicial Council may make
 the form available in additional languages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 457, Sec. 1.   (AB 277)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6227.

The remedies provided in this division are in addition to any other civil or criminal remedies that may be available to the petitioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 219, Sec. 154.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6228.

(a) State and local law enforcement agencies shall provide, upon request and without charging a fee, one copy of all incident report face sheets, one copy of all incident reports, a copy of any accompanying or related photographs of a victim’s injuries, property damage, or any other photographs that are noted in the incident report, and a copy of 911 recordings, if any, to a victim, or the victim’s representative as defined in subdivision (g), of a crime that constitutes an act of any of the following:

(1) Domestic violence, as defined in Section 6211.

(2) Sexual assault, as defined in Sections 261, 261.5, 265, 266, 266a, 266b, 266c, 266g, 266j, 267, 269, 273.4, 285, 286, 287, 288, 288.5, 289, or 311.4
 of, or former Section 262 or 288a of, the Penal Code.

(3) Stalking, as defined in Section 1708.7 of the Civil Code or Section 646.9 of the Penal Code.

(4) Human trafficking, as defined in Section 236.1 of the Penal Code.

(5) Abuse of an elder or a dependent adult, as defined in Section 15610.07 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) (1) A copy of an incident report face sheet shall be made available during regular business hours to a victim or the victim’s representative no later than 48 hours after being requested, unless the state or local law enforcement agency informs the victim or the victim’s representative of the reasons why, for good cause, the incident report face sheet is not available, in which case the incident
 report face sheet shall be made available no later than five working days after the request is made.

(2) A copy of the incident report, any accompanying or related photographs of a victim’s injuries, property damage, or any other photographs that are noted in the incident report, and a copy of 911 recordings, if any, shall be made available during regular business hours to a victim or the victim’s representative no later than five working days after being requested, unless the state or local law enforcement agency informs the victim or the victim’s representative of the reasons why, for good cause, the items are not available, in which case the items shall be made available no later than 10 working days after the request is made.

(c) A person requesting copies under this section shall present state or local law enforcement with the person’s identification, including a current,
 valid driver’s license, a state-issued identification card, or a passport. If the person is a representative of the victim and the victim is deceased, the representative shall also present a certified copy of the death certificate or other satisfactory evidence of the death of the victim at the time a request is made. If the person is a representative of the victim and the victim is alive and not the subject of a conservatorship, the representative shall also present a written authorization, signed by the victim, making the person the victim’s personal representative.

(d) This section shall apply to requests for domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking, human trafficking, or abuse of an elder or a dependent adult face sheets or incident reports, photographs, 911 recordings, and evidence made within five years from the date of completion of the incident report.

(e) This section
 shall be known and may be cited as the Access to Domestic Violence Reports Act of 1999.

(f) For purposes of this section, “victim” includes a minor who is 12 years of age or older.

(g) (1) For purposes of this section, if the victim is deceased, a “representative of the victim” means any of the following:

(A) The surviving spouse.

(B) A surviving child of the decedent who has attained 18 years of age.

(C) A domestic partner, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 297.

(D) A surviving parent of the decedent.

(E) A surviving adult
 relative.

(F) The personal representative of the victim, as defined in Section 58 of the Probate Code, if one is appointed.

(G) The public administrator if one has been appointed.

(2) For purposes of this section, if the victim is not deceased, a “representative of the victim” means any of the following:

(A) A parent, guardian, or adult child of the victim, or an adult sibling of a victim 12 years of age or older, who shall present to law enforcement identification pursuant to subdivision (c). A guardian shall also present to law enforcement a copy of the letters of guardianship demonstrating that the person is the appointed guardian of the victim.

(B) An attorney for the victim, who shall
 present to law enforcement identification pursuant to subdivision (c) and written proof that the person is the attorney for the victim.

(C) A conservator of the victim who shall present to law enforcement identification pursuant to subdivision (c) and a copy of the letters of conservatorship demonstrating that the person is the appointed conservator of the victim.

(3) A representative of the victim does not include any person who has been convicted of murder in the first degree, as defined in Section 189 of the Penal Code, of the victim, or any person identified in the incident report face sheet as a suspect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 495, Sec. 1.   (SB 1518)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

6229.

A minor, under 12 years of age, accompanied by a duly appointed and acting guardian ad litem, shall be permitted to appear in court without counsel for the limited purpose of requesting or opposing a request for a temporary restraining order or injunction, or both, under this division as provided in Section 374 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 572, Sec. 12.   (AB 1596)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 28 of Ch. 572.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. EMERGENCY PROTECTIVE ORDERS [6240. - 6275.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [6240. - 6241.]

6240.

As used in this part:

(a) “Judicial officer” means a judge, commissioner, or referee designated under Section 6241.

(b) “Law enforcement officer” means one of the following officers who requests or enforces an emergency protective order under this part:

(1) A police officer.

(2) A sheriff’s officer.

(3) A peace officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(4) A peace officer of the University of California Police Department.

(5) A peace officer of the California State University and College Police Departments.

(6) A peace officer of the Department of Parks and Recreation, as defined in subdivision (f) of Section 830.2 of the Penal
 Code.

(7) A peace officer of the Department of General Services of the City of Los Angeles, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 830.31 of the Penal Code.

(8) A housing authority patrol officer, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 830.31 of the Penal Code.

(9) A peace officer for a district attorney, as defined in Section 830.1 or 830.35 of the Penal Code.

(10) A parole officer, probation officer, or deputy probation officer, as defined in Section 830.5 of the Penal Code.

(11) A peace officer of a California Community College police department, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.32.

(12) A peace officer employed by a police department of a school district, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 830.32.

(c) “Abduct” means take, entice away, keep, withhold, or conceal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 250, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------
